Utah statutes.
76-10-1221.   Service of process, notice, or demand on registered agent of film distributor.

Any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon the distributor may be served upon the registered agent of that distributor.



Amended by Chapter 43, 2010 General Session

